Utah statutes.
63M-1-2910.   Report to the Legislature -- Study by legislative committees.

(1)  The office shall submit an annual written report to the Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee before November 1 describing:

(a)  the total amount listed on tax credit certificates the office issues under this part;

(b)  the criteria that the office uses in prioritizing the issuance of tax credits amongst tax credit applicants under this part; and

(c)  the economic impact on the state related to providing tax credits under this part.

(2) (a)  On or before November 1, 2016, and every five years after November 1, 2016, the  Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee shall:

(i)  study the tax credits allowed under Sections 59-7-614.6, 59-10-1025, and 59-10-1109; and

(ii)  make recommendations concerning whether the tax credits should be continued, modified, or repealed.

(b)  The study under Subsection (2)(a) shall include an evaluation of:

(i)  the cost of the tax credits under Sections 59-7-614.6, 59-10-1025, and 59-10-1109;

(ii)  the purposes and effectiveness of the tax credits; and

(iii)  the extent to which the state benefits from the tax credits.

